Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0181.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY APPROPRIATION SUMMARY 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,666.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,034,667,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 4,129,100 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,030,538,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 464,268,500 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 1,404,200 Total other state restricted revenues 377,453,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 187,412,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 106.0 Unclassified salaries--FTE positions 6.0 $ 993,100 Accounting service center 1,576,900 Administrative hearings officers 906,600 Environmental investigations--FTEs 12.0 2,459,400 Environmental support--FTEs 56.0 9,465,700 Executive direction--FTEs 20.0 4,480,800 Facilities management 1,000,000 Financial support--FTEs 18.0 10,890,700 Michigan geological survey 3,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Property management 8,098,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 42,872,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from Michigan department of state police 82,800 IDG from state transportation department 108,400 Federal revenues: Federal funds 766,700 Special revenue funds: Private funds 711,600 Air emissions fees 1,054,500 Aquatic nuisance control fund 79,500 Campground fund 25,900 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 2,808,900 Coal ash care fund 17,100 Electronic waste recycling fund 36,200 Environmental education fund 237,400 Environmental pollution prevention fund 558,100 Fees and collections 19,800 Financial instruments 8,561,500 Great Lakes protection fund 548,100 Groundwater discharge permit fees 123,800 Infrastructure construction fund 2,700 Laboratory services fees 673,700 Land and water permit fees 198,500 Medical waste emergency response fund 36,200 Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 5,800 Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 17,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 16,200 NPDES fees 359,700 Oil and gas regulatory fund 466,300 Orphan well fund 71,200 Public swimming pool fund 50,300 Public utility assessments 750,500 Public water supply fees 385,000 Refined petroleum fund 3,371,100 Renew Michigan fund 4,734,000 Sand extraction fee revenue 2,700 Scrap tire regulatory fund 186,000 Septage waste program fund 48,500 Settlement funds 2,000,400 Sewage sludge land application fees 74,400 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 11,700 Solid waste management fund - staff account 769,200 Stormwater permit fees 185,600 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 34,500 Underground storage tank cleanup fund 255,500 Wastewater operator training fees 44,900 Water quality protection fund 8,700 Water use reporting fees 19,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 12,351,500 Sec. 103. WATER RESOURCES DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 408.0 Aquatic nuisance control program--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,000,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal - Great Lakes remedial action plan grants 583,800 Fish contaminant monitoring 316,100 Great Lakes restoration initiative--FTEs 9.0 11,288,300 Groundwater data collection--FTEs 0.0 0 Nonpoint source pollution prevention and control project program 4,083,300 Technology advancements for water monitoring 500,000 Water quality programs--FTEs 225.0 36,580,800 Water quality protection grants 100,000 Water resource programs--FTEs 168.0 28,639,600 Watershed council grants 600,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 83,692,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from state transportation department 2,056,400 Federal revenues: Federal funds 35,144,300 Special revenue funds: Aquatic nuisance control fund 1,000,700 Aquifer protection revolving fund 0 Environmental response fund 590,000 Groundwater discharge permit fees 2,246,900 Infrastructure construction fund 52,000 Land and water permit fees 2,487,300 NPDES fees 4,523,900 Refined petroleum fund 456,000 Sewage sludge land application fees 918,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 143,500 Stormwater permit fees 2,364,000 Wastewater operator training fees 317,400 Water pollution control revolving fund 152,500 Water quality protection fund 100,000 Water use reporting fees 300 State general fund/general purpose $ 31,138,500 Sec. 104. AIR QUALITY DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 228.0 Air quality programs--FTEs 228.0 $ 39,730,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,730,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 7,762,700 Special revenue funds: Air emissions fees 11,290,100 Asbestos inspection fund 2,000,000 Fees and collections 214,300 Oil and gas regulatory fund 148,700 Public utility assessments 150,000 Refined petroleum fund 2,138,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 16,025,700 Sec. 105. REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 327.0 Contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs--FTEs 327.0 $ 83,030,300 Emergency cleanup actions 2,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Environmental cleanup and redevelopment program 27,600,000 Superfund cleanup 9,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 121,630,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 16,759,200 Special revenue funds: Cleanup and redevelopment fund 55,444,200 Environmental response fund 1,442,100 Laboratory services fees 11,392,000 Public water supply fees 330,700 Refined petroleum fund 33,867,500 State brownfield redevelopment fund 2,100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 294,600 Sec. 106. UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK AUTHORITY Full-time equated classified positions 12.0 Underground storage tank cleanup program--FTEs 12.0 $ 32,139,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,139,200 Appropriated from: Federal funds 0 Special revenue funds: Private funds 0 Underground storage tank cleanup fund 32,139,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 107. RENEWING MICHIGAN'S ENVIRONMENT Full-time equated classified positions 170.0 Information Management--FTEs 24.0 $ 7,094,100 Renew Michigan program--FTEs 146.0 70,737,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 77,831,300 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from Michigan department of state police 6,800 IDG from state transportation department 6,300 Federal revenues: Federal funds 5,800 Special revenue funds: Private funds 0 Air emissions fees 67,900 Aquatic nuisance control fund 4,600 Campground fund 1,200 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 184,700 Coal ash care fund 1,000 Electronic waste recycling fund 1,100 Environmental pollution prevention fund 39,800 Fees and collections 120,200 Financial instruments 281,600 Great Lakes protection fund 1,200 Groundwater discharge permit fees 10,700 Laboratory services fees 45,500 Land and water permit fees 14,400 Medical waste emergency response fund 1,100 Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 500 Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 1,300 NPDES fees 24,900 Oil and gas regulatory fund 33,300 Orphan well fund 5,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Public swimming pool fund 1,400 Public water supply fees 26,900 Refined petroleum fund 229,600 Renew Michigan fund 71,052,600 Scrap tire regulatory fund 13,200 Septage waste program fund 1,600 Sewage sludge land application fees 4,600 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 200 Solid waste management fund - staff account 59,100 Stormwater permit fees 12,300 Strategic water quality initiatives fund 0 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 2,000 Underground storage tank cleanup fund 17,000 Wastewater operator training fees 2,800 Water quality protection fund 500 Water use reporting fees 1,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,547,000 Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 10,439,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,439,700 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from Michigan department of state police 23,700 IDG from state transportation department 31,100 Federal revenues: Federal funds 2,062,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Air emissions fees 246,800 Aquatic nuisance control fund 22,900 Campground fund 7,300 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 807,100 Coal ash care fund 5,000 Electronic waste recycling fund 10,600 Environmental pollution prevention fund 158,500 Fees and collections 5,700 Financial instruments 1,084,000 Great Lakes protection fund 11,400 Groundwater discharge permit fees 35,200 Infrastructure construction fund 800 Laboratory services fees 189,600 Land and water permit fees 56,400 Medical waste emergency response fund 10,600 Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 1,700 Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 5,000 Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 5,000 NPDES fees 101,400 Oil and gas regulatory fund 131,600 Orphan well fund 20,400 Public swimming pool fund 14,800 Public utility assessments 19,600 Public water supply fees 108,600 Refined petroleum fund 961,200 Renew Michigan fund 1,459,000 Sand extraction fee revenue 800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Scrap tire regulatory fund 53,100 Septage waste program fund 13,900 Sewage sludge land application fees 21,200 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 3,300 Solid waste management fund - staff account 211,700 Stormwater permit fees 53,100 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 9,800 Underground storage tank cleanup fund 73,600 Wastewater operator training fees 13,100 Water pollution control revolving fund 33,200 Water quality protection fund 2,400 Water use reporting fees 5,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,347,500 Sec. 109. DRINKING WATER AND ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH Full-time equated classified positions 176.0 Drinking water and environmental health--FTEs 176.0 $ 43,994,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 43,994,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 13,755,900 Special revenue funds: Campground fund 388,200 Fees and collections 34,700 Public swimming pool fund 762,200 Public water supply fees 5,074,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Refined petroleum fund 761,100 Septage waste program fund 628,900 Wastewater operator training fees 267,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 22,321,000 Sec. 110. MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 136.0 Energy programs-- FTEs 15.0 $ 6,677,200 Material management programs-- FTEs 121.0 25,184,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,861,400 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from Michigan department of state police 1,590,500 Federal revenues: Federal funds 7,353,300 Special revenue funds: Private funds 652,600 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 1,090,500 Coal ash care fund 268,100 Community pollution prevention fund 250,000 Community surcharge reimbursement fund 0 Electronic waste recycling fund 333,700 Energy efficiency and renewable energy revolving loan fund 250,100 Environmental pollution prevention fund 4,167,300 Host community grant funds 0 Materials management planning fund 0 Medical waste emergency response fund 454,500 Public utility assessments 1,806,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Retired engineers technical assistance program fund 491,200 Scrap tire regulatory fund 5,147,300 Small business pollution prevention revolving loan fund 134,400 Solid waste management fund - staff account 6,204,200 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 465,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,202,000 Sec. 111. GEOLOGIC RESOURCES MANAGEMENT DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 73.0 Geologic resources management--FTEs 73.0 $ 26,531,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,531,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of licensing and regulatory affairs 223,100 Federal revenues: Federal funds 153,100 Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 5,155,400 Special revenue funds: Private funds 40,000 Aquifer protection revolving fund 520,000 Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 92,500 Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 216,000 Native copper mine fund 50,000 Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 385,800 Oil and gas regulatory fund 8,538,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Orphan well fund 2,351,500 Sand extraction fee revenue 91,100 Water use reporting fees 351,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,362,700 Sec. 112. WATER INFRASTRUCTURE Full-time equated classified positions 30.0 Municipal assistance--FTEs 30.0 $ 6,744,300 Water infrastructure 23,601,300 Water infrastructure risks and reserve fund 5,000,000 Water state revolving funds 468,599,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 503,945,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 105,349,800 Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 270,000,000 Special revenue funds: Community infrastructure fund 45,000,000 Revolving loan revenue bonds 15,000,000 Water pollution control revolving fund 774,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 67,821,200 Sec. 113. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Electric charging infrastructure $ 10,000,000 Jefferson-Chalmers flood mitigation 100 Information management initiative 10,000,000 Septic system database 100 Water use advisory council recommendations 100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,000,300 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Federal revenues: Federal funds 0 Special revenue funds: State general fund/general purpose $ 20,000,300 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2025-2026 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state resources is $560,265,700.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $55,733,300.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Brownfield grants $ 1,000,000 Drinking water and environmental health 8,786,000 Emergency cleanup actions 116,000 Energy programs 460,000 Lead service line replacement 23,601,300 Material management programs 1,270,000 Renew Michigan program 20,000,000 Technology advancements for water monitoring 500,000 TOTAL $ 55,733,300 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (b) "Director" means the director of the department. (c) "FTE" means full-time equated. (d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (e) "NPDES" means the national pollutant discharge elimination system. (f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate appropriations subcommittee on environment, Great Lakes, and energy; the house appropriations subcommittee on environment, Great Lakes, and energy; the senate and house fiscal agencies; the senate and house policy offices; and the state budget office. Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part. This requirement includes transmitting reports to the required recipients by email and posting the reports on an internet site. Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services , or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (d) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured in facilities that employ union members. Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department for communicating with a member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must list travel outside of this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related expenses of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, and other revenues. Sec. 208. The department shall not use funds appropriated in part 1 to hire a person to provide legal services that are the responsibility of the attorney general. This section does not apply to legal services for bonding activities or to outside legal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 services that the attorney general authorizes. Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state budget office shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $15,800,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (d) The number of active department employees by job classification. (e) Job specifications and wage rates. Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 214. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government resources, programs, or facilities. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or interfere with the duties of a local health officer. Sec. 215. To the extent permissible under the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director shall take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract with certified geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section, "geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term as defined in Executive Directive 2023-1. Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on the number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification, including a comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 218. The department shall make each report required to be submitted under this part readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report on the department's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date required for each report. In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years. Sec. 219. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department may electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 220. Not later than April 1, the department shall report 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 222. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations in part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 223. (1) General fund appropriations in part 1 shall not be expended for items if federal funding or private grant funding is available for the same expenditures. (2) If the department is required to make a reduction in expenditures under section 395(1) or (2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1395, for any appropriation under this part or part 1, the department must notify the standard report recipients not later than 10 days after the reduction. The notification must include, but not be limited to, the following: (a) A description of the fund source that is insufficient to support the expenditures being reduced and the amount of the reduction. (b) A description of the cause for the reduction, if any such cause is known. (c) A description of the functions of state government or services to residents that will be affected by the reduction. Sec. 224. (1) Within 10 days after the effective date of this act, the department must provide a report to the standard report recipients containing the following information: (a) A list of any sections in this act that the department determines to be unenforceable, with a detailed legal rationale for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 those determinations, as applicable. (b) If a determination under subdivision (a) would affect the operations of a program or programs within the department, the department must report the estimated difference in cost between the policy outlined in the section determined to be unenforceable and the policy the department intends to pursue. (2) The department may coordinate with the executive office of the governor or other state departments or agencies to compile a statewide report for any departments or agencies required to submit a report substantially similar to the report described under subsection (1). Sec. 225. The department must provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following: (a) Affect the operations of the department. (b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (c) Affect regulations that currently protect the public to the extent that the regulations affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (d) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the public. Sec. 227. (1) The department may expend amounts remaining from the current and prior fiscal year appropriations to meet funding needs of the environmental cleanup and redevelopment program, environmental cleanup support, contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs, contaminated site cleanup, contaminated 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 site cleanup contingency reserve, premcor remediation activities, PFAS remediation grant program, the renew Michigan program, the refined petroleum product cleanup program, brownfield grants and loans, waterfront grants, and the environmental bond site reclamation program. (2) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the clean Michigan initiative fund - response activities contained in 2011 PA 63, 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, and 2017 PA 107, are appropriated for expenditure. (3) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the refined petroleum fund activities contained in 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, 2018 PA 207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, 2022 PA 166, 2023 PA 119, and 2024 PA 121 are appropriated for expenditure. (4) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the strategic water quality initiatives fund contained in 2011 PA 50, 2011 PA 63, 2012 PA 200, 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, and 2018 PA 207, are appropriated for expenditure. (5) For the strategic water quality initiatives fund, funds not yet disbursed are appropriated for expenditure for the same program under sections 5201, 5202, and 5204e of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5201, 324.5202, and 324.5204e. (6) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the renew Michigan fund contained in 2018 PA 207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, 2022 PA 166, 2023 PA 119, and 2024 PA 121 are appropriated for expenditure. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (7) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the contaminated site cleanup contingency fund contained in 2021 PA 87 and 2022 PA 166, are appropriated for expenditure. (8) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the cleanup and redevelopment fund contained in 2022 PA 166 and 2023 PA 119 are appropriated for expenditure. Sec. 228. Revenues that remain in the settlements fund at the end of the fiscal year carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 235. (1) Semiannually, the department shall prepare a report that contains information regarding all remediation and redevelopment efforts funded from part 1. (2) The report must contain the following information: (a) List of sites where work is planned to occur, including the county for each site. (b) The type of site, whether refined petroleum cleanup, nonrefined petroleum cleanup, brownfield, or a combination of types. (c) A brief description of how the issue will be addressed, including whether contractors will be utilized. (d) The estimated date for project completion. (e) The amount and funding source or sources allocated to the site. (3) The report must be submitted to the senate and house subcommittees on the environment, Great Lakes, and energy and the state budget director. Sec. 238. The department shall submit a report to the senate and house standing committees and appropriations subcommittees with 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 primary responsibility for issues under the jurisdiction of the department that details departmental activities of the most recent fiscal year in administering permitting programs. The report must include, at a minimum, all of the following: (a) The number of FTEs assigned to each permitting program and the number of unfilled positions at the beginning and end of the most recent fiscal year. (b) The number of permit applications received by the department in the preceding year, including applications for new and increased uses and reissuances. (c) The number of permits for each program approved. (d) The number of permits for each program denied. (e) The percentage and number of permit applications that were reviewed for administrative completeness within statutory time frames. (f) The percentage and number of permit applications for which a final action was taken by the department within statutory time frames for new and increased uses and reissuances. (g) Activities to reduce any backlog of permits that exceed the statutory time frames and the average time frame for permit approvals for each program. (h) Activities to reduce the percentage of permit applications submitted as incomplete, in need of modification, or additional information before final determination. (i) Under conditions in which the department states a permit is incomplete or denied, the department shall provide an explanation as to the reason or reasons the permit is insufficient and how the permit can be strengthened or made complete. Sec. 242. If the department responds to a significant incident 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to protect life or property, as soon as possible and within 24 hours after the department responds to the significant incident, the department shall notify, in writing, the senate and house members whose district includes the site. Sec. 244. In expending federal funds, the department shall comply with the requirements of the Justice40 Initiative, where applicable. Sec. 245. (1) For any grant program or project funded in part 1 intended for a single recipient organization or unit of local government, the grant program or project is for a public purpose and the department shall follow procurement statutes of this state, including any bidding requirements, unless the department can fully validate, through information detailed in this part or public supporting documents, both of the following: (a) The specific organization or unit of local government that will receive or administer the funds. (b) How the funds will be administered and expended. (2) To be eligible to receive a grant described in subsection (1), both of the following must occur: (a) A recipient must submit the application under subsection (3) not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act. (b) A recipient must be 1 of the following: (i) A unit of local government, as that term is defined in section 115 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1115. (ii) An institution of higher education. (iii) A state agency, as that term is defined in section 115 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1115. (iv) An entity registered with the department of licensing and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 regulatory affairs or the department of attorney general that has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. (v) Another entity that can demonstrate, through state or federal tax filings or other state or federal government records, that it has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. (3) Notwithstanding any other conditions or requirements for direct appropriation grants, the department shall work with the state budget office to perform at least all of the following activities to administer the grants described in subsection (1): (a) Develop a standard application process using the electronic submission portal developed by the state budget office, grantee reporting requirements, and any other necessary documentation, including sponsorship information as specified under subsection (4). If the electronic submission portal identified in this subdivision is not fully functional by 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall ensure that the standard application process and form are available promptly and paper submission is acceptable. The state budget office shall promptly submit application material received to the department for departmental review. (b) Establish a process to review, complete, and execute a grant agreement with a grant recipient. The department shall not execute a grant agreement unless all necessary documentation has been submitted and reviewed. (c) Verify to the extent possible that a grant recipient will use funds for a public purpose that serves the economic prosperity, health, safety, or general welfare of the residents of this state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) Review and verify all necessary information to ensure the grant recipient is reasonably able to execute the grant agreement, perform its fiduciary duty, and comply with all applicable state and federal statutes. The department may deduct the cost of background checks and any other efforts performed as part of this verification from the amount of the designated grant award. (e) Establish a standard timeline to review all documents submitted by grant recipients and provide a response within 45 business days stating whether submitted documents by a grant recipient are sufficient or in need of additional information. If additional information is needed, the 60-day deadline in subsection (2) is considered to have been met if a sponsor has been identified for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (f) Make an initial disbursement of up to 50% of the grant to the grant recipient not later than 60 days after a grant agreement has been executed. Disbursements must be consistent with part II, chapter 10, section 200 of the Financial Management Guide. (g) Disburse the funds remaining after the initial disbursement under subdivision (f) per the grant disbursement schedule in the executed grant agreement on a reimbursement basis after the grantee has provided sufficient documentation, as determined by the department, to verify that expenditures were made in accordance with the project purpose. (4) The process for the identification and sponsorship of a grant described in subsection (1) is as follows: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Not later than the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall provide an initial list of grants that require legislative sponsorship to the legislature and shall make public an initial list of grants that likely will be sponsored by the department or by the state budget office. (b) A sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) must be a legislator, the department, or the state budget office. (c) A legislative sponsor must be identified through a letter submitted by that legislator's office to the department and state budget director containing the name of the grant recipient, the intended amount of the grant, a certification from that legislator that the grant is for a public purpose, and specific citation of the section and subsection of the public act that authorizes the grant, as applicable. (d) Within 10 business days after the effective date of this act, the senate and house of representatives shall compile an initial list of legislative grant sponsors for their respective chambers and submit those compiled lists to the state budget office and the department, and the state budget office shall identify department- or state budget office-sponsored grants. The state budget director may grant an extension of this deadline of not more than 30 days on a case-by-case basis. The state budget office shall make the compiled lists public within 14 business days after the effective date of this act. (e) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall publish a final list of grants requiring sponsorship. If a legislative sponsor is not identified within 60 days after the effective date of this act, the department shall do 1 of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) Identify the department or the state budget office as the sponsor. (ii) Decline to execute the grant agreement and lapse the associated funds at the end of the fiscal year. (f) At any point during the fiscal year, legislative grant sponsors may be added to a grant request. (5) An executed grant agreement under this section between the department and a grant recipient must include at least all of the following: (a) All necessary identifying information for the grant recipient, including any tax and financial information for the department to administer funds under this section. (b) A description of the project for which the grant funds will be expended, including tentative timelines and the estimated budget. The department shall not reimburse expenditures that are outside of the project purpose, as stated in the executed grant agreement, from appropriations in part 1. The grantee shall return to the treasury any interest in excess of $1,000.00 earned on the grant funds while unexpended and in possession of the grantee. (c) Unless otherwise specified in department policy, a requirement that funds appropriated for the grants described in subsection (1) may be used only for expenditures that occur on or after the effective date of this act. (d) A requirement for reporting by the grant recipient to the department and the legislative sponsor that provides the status of the project and an accounting of all funds expended by the grant recipient, as determined by the department. (e) A claw-back provision that allows the department of treasury to recoup or otherwise collect any funds that are 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 declined, unspent, or otherwise misused. (f) The signed legislative sponsorship letter required under subsection (4), incorporated into the grant agreement and included as an appendix or attachment. (g) If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement, the state budget office shall promptly transmit that information to the department for the department's review of the grant application. If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement within 60 days after the effective date of this act, but the grant application needs technical fixes or additional legislative action, as identified by the state budget office, the 60-day deadline in this subdivision is considered to have been met, if a sponsor has been identified for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (6) If appropriate to improve the administration or oversight of a grant described in subsection (1), the department may adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department to perform the required duties under this section. (7) A grant recipient shall respond to all reasonable information requests from the department related to grant expenditures and retain grant records for not less than 7 years, and the grant may be subject to monitoring, site visits, and audits as determined by the department. The grant agreement required under this section must include signed assurance by the chief executive officer or other executive officer of the grant recipient that the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 requirements of this subsection will be met. (8) The grant recipient shall expend all funds awarded and complete all projects not later than September 30, 2030. If at that time any unexpended funds remain, the grant recipient shall return those funds to the state treasury. (9) Any funds that are granted to a state department are appropriated in that department for the purpose of the intended grant. (10) The state budget director may, on a case-by-case basis, extend the deadline in subsection (8) on request by a grant recipient if a sponsor has been identified for the grant. The state budget director shall notify the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees not later than 5 days after an extension is granted. (11) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the state budget office shall post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website. The report must list the grant recipient, project purpose, and location of the project for each grant described in subsection (1), the status of funds allocated and disbursed under the grant agreement, and the legislative sponsor, if applicable. After March 1, the state budget office shall update the report monthly and shall post the updated report each month. The state budget office shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the office has available at the time of posting for grants awarded. The state budget office may compile the information required in this report across all departments. The department shall assist the state budget office with the compilation of the report required under this subsection. (12) On request, beginning 75 days after the effective date of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this act, the state budget office shall release information received for grant applications. (13) As applicable, the legislative sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) shall not sponsor a grant, or ask another legislator to sponsor a grant, if there is a conflict of interest related to the grant recipient. (14) If the department reasonably determines that the funds allocated for an executed grant agreement under this section were misused or that use of the funds was misrepresented by the grant recipient, the department shall not award any additional funds under the executed grant agreement and shall refer the grant for review following internal audit protocols. Sec. 246. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. A department or agency receiving an appropriation under this part or part 1 must notify the standard report recipients if an appropriation of funds described under this section is projected to lapse. REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION Sec. 301. Revenues remaining in the laboratory services fees fund at the end of the fiscal year carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 302. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for contaminated site investigations, cleanup and revitalization, emergency cleanup actions, and environmental cleanup and redevelopment program are designated as work project appropriations, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the projects is to provide contaminated site cleanup. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The total estimated cost of all projects is identified in each line-item appropriation. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 304. (1) In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend money from the subaccounts of the cleanup and redevelopment fund as described under section 20108 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20108, including the environmental response fund or the natural resource damages fund, to provide funding for actions by the department that are authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction and set forth in a final court order or judgment in an action to which the department is a party. (2) By January 30, the department shall submit a report to the appropriations subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that provides a summary of the expenditures incurred under this section during the preceding fiscal year. WATER RESOURCES DIVISION Sec. 405. If a certified health department does not exist in a city, county, or district or does not fulfill its responsibilities under part 117 of the natural resources and environmental 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11701 to 324.11721, then the department may spend funds appropriated in part 1 for drinking water and environmental health in accordance with section 11716 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11716. Sec. 410. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall compile a report by November 1 of every fiscal year ending in an odd number on the status of the implementation plan for the western Lake Erie basin collaborative agreement. In an effort to learn more about the presence and timing of harmful algal blooms, the report shall contain all of the following: (a) An estimated cost of removal of total phosphorus per pound at the 4 major wastewater treatment plants. (b) A description of the grants that have been awarded. (c) A description of the work that has commenced on the issue of dissolved reactive phosphorus, the expected objectives and outcomes of that work, and a list of the parties involved in that effort. (d) A description of the efforts and outcomes aimed at the total phosphorus reduction for the River Raisin watershed. UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK AUTHORITY Sec. 701. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the underground storage tank cleanup program are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide underground storage tank cleanup. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $20,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. RENEWING MICHIGAN'S ENVIRONMENT Sec. 801. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the renewing Michigan's environment program are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is for environmental cleanup and redevelopment, waste management, and recycling. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $70,495,800.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION Sec. 901. In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend money from the Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement to provide funding for activities as outlined within the State's Mitigation Plan. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall prepare a report to the appropriations subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office by February 1, 2026 of the expenditures incurred under this section during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. GEOLOGIC RESOURCES MANAGEMENT DIVISION Sec. 925. As a condition on the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall coordinate and convene with relevant stakeholders to discuss methods to improve program funding with a goal of aligning fee revenue with program costs for geologic resources management in future fiscal years. WATER INFRASTRUCTURE Sec. 951. The funds appropriated in part 1 for lead service line replacement must be used to support lead service line replacement and associated activities, including, but not limited to, water main replacement to promote coordinated water infrastructure work in overburdened and significantly overburdened communities, as those terms are defined by the department in accordance with the requirements under parts 53 and 54 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5301 to 324.5316 and 324.5401 to 324.5418. Sec. 952. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for water state revolving funds from the community infrastructure fund must be used to offset unanticipated increased project costs due to higher federal tariffs affecting foreign trade and the cost and availability of construction materials. The funds may be used to do either of the following: (a) Offset the increased costs due to supply chain issues in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the delivery of materials used for water infrastructure projects, lead service line replacement projects, drinking water projects, or any combination of these projects. (b) Offset federal funding for shovel-ready projects that have already been approved and federal funding has recently been revoked or reduced. (2) Funding should be prioritized to fill gaps in projects that are closest to completion or provide the most protection for public health, as determined by the department. (3) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for water state revolving funds from the community infrastructure fund are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for the projects under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to assist in the completion of infrastructure projects by offsetting increased project costs. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing state resources or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $40,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 953. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the water infrastructure risks and reserve fund shall be used to provide grants and loans to communities experiencing water infrastructure emergencies. A minimum of 40% of the funds must be awarded to communities located within environmental justice communities, as that term is determined by the department, and overburdened and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 significantly overburdened communities, as those terms are defined by the department, in accordance with the requirements under parts 53 and 54 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5301 to 324.5316 and 324.5401 to 324.5418. (2) The funds must be utilized for the following: (a) To provide grants to assist communities experiencing water infrastructure emergencies, as determined by the department, and to assist with immediate needs related to water infrastructure. (b) To provide funding to assist with grants or loans to aid communities experiencing water infrastructure emergencies that will facilitate the repair, rebuilding, or remediating of the effects of the emergency related to water infrastructure, as determined by the department. (3) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for water infrastructure risks and reserve fund are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for the projects under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to assist communities dealing with a water infrastructure emergency. (b) The fund shall not be depleted unless there is a public health emergency or natural disaster declaration. (c) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing state resources or contracts with service providers, or both. (d) The total estimated cost of the project is $5,000,000.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 1001. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for electric charging infrastructure shall be used for grants to support the deployment of electric vehicle charging stations and hydrogen fueling infrastructure. (2) Grants awarded under this section may be used for, but not limited to, any of the following activities: (a) Filling gaps in fast charging systems outside of this state's identified alternative fuel corridors. (b) Deploying publicly or nonpublicly available charging and fueling stations, including, but not limited to, light-, medium- and heavy-duty fleet lots and transit systems. (c) Purchasing and leasing alternative fuel public and private light, medium, and heavy-duty fleet vehicles. (d) Deploying charging and clean fuel infrastructure in rural communities. (e) Deploying publicly or nonpublicly available charging and fueling stations and supporting enabling upgrades to support deployment at single and multifamily housing units. (3) The department shall utilize assessments and tools to identify the most appropriate locations to deploy clean fuel and charging infrastructure supported by this appropriation. (4) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for electric charging infrastructure are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for the projects under this section until the project 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support the installation of charging and clean fuel infrastructure, and accelerate the adoption of alternative fuel vehicles to enable the transition to sustainable transportation options. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state resources or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $10,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. (5) The department shall expend no more than 5% from the funds appropriated in part 1 for electric vehicle infrastructure for administrative purposes. Sec. 1003. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for information management initiative are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for the projects under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support the digitization and indexing of department records. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state resources or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $10,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030.